Utah statutes.
32B-1-502.   Purpose -- Application to other laws.

(1)  This part establishes reasonable and uniform time, place, and manner of operation requirements relating to attire, conduct, and sexually oriented entertainers on premises or at an event at which an alcoholic product is sold, offered for sale, furnished, or allowed to be consumed under a retail license or permit issued by the commission so as to:

(a)  reduce the adverse secondary effects that the attire, conduct, and sexually oriented entertainers may have upon communities of this state; and

(b)  protect the health, peace, safety, welfare, and morals of the residents of communities of this state.

(2)  Nothing in this part allows the showing or display of any matter that is contrary to:

(a)  applicable federal or state statutes prohibiting obscenity; or

(b)  state statutes relating to lewdness or indecent public displays.

(3)  A local authority may be more restrictive of attire, conduct, or sexually oriented entertainers of the type prohibited in this part.

